Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6283.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1110. (1) The department shall issue a license to a barber college that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Through its the owners or managers of the barber college, has applied to the department for a license. (b) Subject to subsection (6), provides an educational program that requires completion of 225 hours of classroom study, demonstrations, and recitations and 1,575 hours of practical barber training. (c) Meets the sanitation standards required of barbershops as set forth in rules promulgated by the board and determined by inspection by the department. (d) Files and maintains a corporate surety or cash bond of $10,000.00 conditioned on the faithful performance and satisfaction of the contractual rights of students enrolled in the barber college. (e) Employs or contracts with not fewer than 2 1 full-time, licensed instructors instructor and ensures that both of the following are met: (i) At any time classroom study or theory training is given to any number of students, at least 1 instructor is present. (ii) If practical training occurs, there is at least 1 instructor is present for every 30 students at all times. (f) Except as provided in subsection (7), is completely partitioned from any other place of business or dwelling. Except as provided in subsection (7), a person shall not conduct any other business from a barber college other than the rendering of barber services and the teaching of barbering. , although a A barber college may sell at retail to patrons those preparations used on patrons who are receiving barbering services from students. (g) Provides reasonable classroom facilities and other equipment for the proper instruction of students described in this subdivision and rules promulgated by the board, including 1 stationary wash basin with hot and cold running water and a connected drain for every 2 barber chairs. A barber college shall arrange its the barber college's enrollment and course scheduling so that students are not required to share the use of a training station during any practical training period. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a student instructor may not instruct without a supervising instructor present in the room. In case of emergency, a student instructor may instruct up to 30 students, but the barber college shall provide notice of the emergency to the department in writing and ensure that an instructor is on the premises at all times. Use of a student instructor as a substitute instructor under this subsection shall must not continue for more than 7 consecutive days without written approval of the department certifying the emergency circumstances. (3) The license of a barber college is automatically revoked if there is a transfer of ownership or change of location of a barber college. The department shall not grant a new license to new owners or for a new location unless the requirements of subsection (1) are met. (4) The classroom courses of a barber college shall must include at least all of the following: scientific fundamentals for barbering; hygiene; bacteriology; histology of hair, skin, and nails; structure of the head, face, and neck, including muscles and nerves; elementary chemistry relating to sterilization and antiseptics; diseases of the skin, hair, glands, and nails; massaging and manipulating the head, face, and neck; haircutting and shaving; cosmetic therapy; arranging, styling, dressing, coloring, bleaching, curling, permanent waving, and tinting of the hair; elements of business training; and barber laws and rules of the this state. (5) The department by rule shall prescribe the number of hours of instruction a barber college is required to provide for each subject set forth in subsection (4). Each barber college shall provide a written copy of the rules to each student at the beginning of his or her the student's instruction. (6) For the purposes of subsection (1)(b) and section 1108(1)(c), if a student of a barber college is licensed as a cosmetologist under article 12, the barber college may allow the student to substitute hours of instruction completed at a state school of cosmetology for hours of instruction that are substantially similar in content to hours of instruction at the barber college. However, a A barber college shall not allow a student to substitute more than 1,000 hours of substantially similar instruction from a state school of cosmetology for hours of instruction at the barber college under this subsection. The department by rule shall establish criteria for determining whether an hour of instruction at a state school of cosmetology is substantially similar to an hour of instruction at a barber college. As used in this subsection and subsection (7), "state school of cosmetology" means a school of cosmetology that is licensed under article 12. (7) A barber college and a state school of cosmetology may occupy the same building and share facilities. (8) A barber college shall display the license of the barber college and all instructors, student instructors, and students in a prominent place visible to the public at all times. An individual's license may be displayed at the individual's work station.